Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.523, is amended to read: 84.523 BWCA; MANAGING MINERALS AND RELATED RESOURCES. Subdivision 1. Definition. new text begin (a) new text end For the purposes of this sectionnew text begin and section 84.5235new text end , the deleted text begin termdeleted text end new text begin following terms have the meanings given.new text end new text begin (b)new text end "Boundary Waters Canoe Areanew text begin Wildernessnew text end " means that area of lands and waters included within the boundaries designated in deleted text begin federal regulation REG U-3, Code of Federal Regulations, title 36, section 293.16, as that regulation provided on January 1, 1975.deleted text end new text begin Public Law 95-495.new text end new text begin (c) "Rainy River headwaters" means that area of land and waters included within the Rainy River headwaters of the Rainy River basin designated on the Department of Natural Resources map entitled Minnesota's Watershed Basins as identified in Minnesota Rules, part 7050.0470, subpart 2, item A, subitem (1), and designated on the map of Minnesota's Major Watersheds under Minnesota Rules, part 7050.0469 (HUC 09030001). new text end Subd. 2. Intent. The legislature finds that a combination of state legislative and administrative actions and court decisions have established a public policy of primarily wilderness management for state lands and waters within the Boundary Waters Canoe Areanew text begin Wildernessnew text end . This state policy, together with a similar federal policy and international actions consistent with these state and federal policies, has created an area of hundreds of thousands of acres of land and water containing myriad lakes and streams, wooded shores, virgin forests, and other natural attractions of surpassing scenic beauty and solitude, free from substantially all commercial activities and artificial development such as hydroelectric dams and power lines, resorts, roads, sawmills, and timber harvesting in no-cut zones. Subd. 3. Mining; prohibition. new text begin (a) new text end Except with the prior approval of the legislature in those cases of national emergency deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin that new text end have been declared by the Congress and deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin that new text end direct the need for exploration and mining of federal lands within the Boundary Waters Canoe Areadeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin Wilderness new text end and after an investigation and determination by the commissioner of natural resources pursuant to subdivision 5new text begin ,new text end no state-owned or administered land may be leased for exploration or mining of minerals, and no state permits, licenses or leases shall be issued to use any other state natural resources for any mineral exploration or mining operations in the Boundary Waters Canoe Areanew text begin Wildernessnew text end . new text begin (b) The commissioner of natural resources may not issue a permit to mine nonferrous metallic minerals within the Rainy River headwaters unless: new text end new text begin (1) the level of sulfate in potentially affected surface water or groundwater is not estimated to increase as a result of the mine by more than zero parts per million; new text end new text begin (2) the permit to mine prohibits mining operations if the level of sulfate in affected surface water or groundwater increases as a result of the mine by more than zero parts per million; and new text end new text begin (3) the permit to mine requires the water quality of surface waters that may be affected by the mining operations to be monitored and the monitoring results to be made available through the Pollution Control Agency's surface water data access website. new text end Subd. 4. Peat harvesting; prohibition. Except with prior approval of the legislature in those cases of national emergency deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin that new text end have been declared by the Congress and deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin that new text end direct the need for exploitation of peat deposits on federal land within the Boundary Waters Canoe Areadeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin Wilderness new text end and after an investigation and determination by the commissioner of natural resources pursuant to subdivision 5new text begin ,new text end no state-owned or administered land may be leased for the purpose of harvesting peat, and no state permits, licenses or leases shall be issued to use any other state natural resources for the purpose of harvesting peat in the Boundary Waters Canoe Areanew text begin Wildernessnew text end . Subd. 5. Investigation and determination. In the event of a national emergency declared by Congress deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin that new text end requires, for the protection of national interests, exploitation of natural resources of the type found in the Boundary Waters Canoe Areanew text begin Wildernessnew text end , the commissioner of natural resources shall investigate and determine if there are reasonable alternative methods for providing the needed resources. If the investigation shows there are reasonable alternatives to exploitation of natural resources in the area, no permit for development shall be issued. If the commissioner of natural resources determines there is a need to provide resources from within the Boundary Waters Canoe Areadeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin Wilderness new text end and that there is no reasonable alternative available to meet the need, a permit may be issued upon approval by the state legislature. Subd. 6. State-owned lands. Acquired lands owned by the state within the Boundary Waters Canoe Areanew text begin Wildernessnew text end defined in subdivision 1 are designated as state wilderness areas under section 86A.05, subdivision 6. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [84.5235] RAINY RIVER HEADWATERS NONFERROUS MINING; SULFATE. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding section 93.481, subdivision 4, if the commissioner of natural resources determines that an increase in sulfate in surface water or groundwater in excess of zero parts per million has occurred as a result of a nonferrous metallic mineral mine within the Rainy River headwaters, the commissioner must order the permittee to suspend operations under the permit to mine. The commissioner must assess a civil penalty in the amount of $500,000,000 for violating the terms of the permit established under section 84.523, subdivision 3, paragraph (b), clause (2). new text end new text begin (b) A permittee ordered to suspend operations under paragraph (a) must immediately suspend operations. The permittee may resume operations only after the commissioner has reinstated the permit under paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner of natural resources may reinstate the permit to mine after the commissioner determines that the permittee has demonstrated that: new text end new text begin (1) the increase in sulfate has been remedied by providing the results of three years of continuous water-quality monitoring conducted by a third party approved by the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency; and new text end new text begin (2) future mining operations will not increase the level of sulfate in surface water or groundwater by more than zero parts per million. new text end new text begin (d) The permittee must provide all access to the mine that is necessary to conduct water-quality monitoring required under paragraph (c) and cover all costs of the third party conducting the water-quality monitoring. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end